Utah statutes.
53A-17a-102.   Purpose of chapter.
(1)  The purpose of this chapter is to provide a minimum school program for
the state in accordance with the constitutional mandate.  It recognizes that
all children of the state are entitled to reasonably equal educational
opportunities regardless of their place of residence in the state and of the
economic situation of their respective school districts or other agencies.
(2)  It further recognizes that although the establishment of an educational
system is primarily a state function, school districts should be required to
participate on a partnership basis in the payment of a reasonable portion of
the cost of a minimum program.
(3)  It is also the purpose of this chapter to describe the manner in which
the state and the school districts shall pay their respective share of the
costs of a minimum program.  This chapter also recognizes that each locality
should be empowered to provide educational facilities and opportunities beyond
the minimum program and accordingly provide a method whereby that latitude of
action is permitted and encouraged.
